src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ============ !
! Proper nouns !
! ============ !

! Note: the final non-Sámi consonants:
!          b  d  g  h  m  n  p  t  z
! write as b9 d9 g9 h9 m9 n9 p9 t9 z9

! (t9 in consonant clusters)
! Note: the final vowel e9, used for e-stems that NEVER may have illatives
! in -ii (Mandrake:Mandrakei, iige *Mandrakii)

! j that shall always be j (also in V_C) is written j9, as eg. in Ajja (Aj9ja)

! Table of content
! ----------------
! Continuation lexica
!  Firstpart tag
!  Case etc tags
! Personal names
!  First names
!  Surnames
! Place names
! ----------------


! Continuation lexica
! ===================

! FirstTag

LEXICON FirstTag
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;

! Names Proper

! Some of the entries point to continuation lexica in the sme-lex.txt
! file, su^ch as GOAHTI. This implies that names have the same inflection as
! ordinary nouns, whi^ch is probably not true. These lexica must thus be re-
! vised as soon as the lexica for names become more accurate.

! Continuation lexica for personal names
! --------------------------------------

! Vowel final names
! - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON ACCRA-ani
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%>             ACCRADECL     ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ACCRA-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON ACCRA-objplc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> ACCRADECL         ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON ACCRA-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON ACCRA-mal
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>             ACCRADECL     ;
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  #             ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ACCRA-malsur
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>            ACCRADECL ;
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            ACCRADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON ACCRA-fem
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>             ACCRADECL     ;
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  #             ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ACCRA-femsur
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>            ACCRADECL ;
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            ACCRADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON ACCRA-femplc !Names that are both female names and place names
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>            ACCRADECL         ;
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>            ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
                                :%>            PLACELASH         ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #                 ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON ACCRA-malfem
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>             ACCRADECL     ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>             ACCRADECL     ;
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  #             ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  #             ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ACCRA-sur
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            ACCRADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ;
        +Use/Sub:%> PLACELASH      ; !

LEXICON ACCRA-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
                :%> PLACELASH         ;

LEXICON ACCRA ! Vowel-final names without Gradation and Ill ^change
 +N+Prop:%> ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON ACCRADECL
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
   ACCRA-DC     ;
   ACCRA-I      ; ! correct suffixes
   ACCRA-OBL    ;
   ACCRA-IICASE ;

LEXICON ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
   ACCRA-DC          ;
   ACCRA-I           ; ! correct suffixes
   ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASE ;


LEXICON ACCRADECL-LOAN
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
                                 ACCRA-DC-LOAN     ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-I           ; !		! correct suffixes
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ; !
!@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASE; !

LEXICON RONDANE-plc
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:e%>@U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-OBL ;

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-plc
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:e%>@U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-SG-OBL ;

LEXICON RONDANE-LOAN ! Place names
  @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:e%>@U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-OBL ; ! XXX Why is regular inflection sub?
   @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:e@U.Cap.Obl@   K           ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpN/SgN:e@U.Cap.Obl@   RHyph       ; ! Why do we need RHyph here, when it is also defined in RONDANE-OBL?
                            +Use/Sub:e%>            PLACELASH   ; !

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-LOAN ! Place names
  @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:e%>@U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-SG-OBL ;
   @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:e@U.Cap.Obl@   K              ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpN/SgN:e@U.Cap.Obl@   RHyph          ;
                            +Use/Sub:%>             PLACELASH      ; !

LEXICON RONDANE-sur
              @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:e%>@U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:e%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #           ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON RONDANE-fem
           @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:e%>@U.Cap.Obl@  RONDANE-OBL   ;
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:e%>@U.Cap.Obl@  #             ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/Dimin:e%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON RONDANE-mal
           @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:e%>@U.Cap.Obl@  RONDANE-OBL   ;
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:e%>@U.Cap.Obl@  #             ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/Dimin:e%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL


LEXICON RONDANE-obj
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:e%>@U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-OBL ;

LEXICON RONDANE-org
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Org:e%>@U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-OBL ;
