src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Abisko:Abisko9 ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;
Aino:Aino9 ACCRA-fem ;
Airo:Airo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Alamo:Alamo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Antero:Antero9 ACCRA-mal ;
Argentina:Argentina ACCRA-LOAN-plc ; !
Argentiinná:Argentiinná ACCRA-plc ;
Arkivfoto:Arkiv^foto9 ACCRA-org ;
Arredondo:Arredondo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Azazello:Azazello9 ACCRA-org ;
Bajit FirstTag ;
Barbro:Barbro9 ACCRA-fem ;
Bengalo:Bengalo9 ACCRA-org ;
Betio:Betio9 ACCRA-plc ;
Bilbao:Bilbao9 ACCRA-mal ;
Branco:Branco9 ACCRA-plc ;
Bravo:Bravo9 ACCRA-ani ;
Berjjo ACCRA-ani ;
Geso ACCRA-ani ;
Busi ACCRA-ani ;
Cacho:Cacho9 ACCRA-sur ;
Canoa FirstTag ;
ChevronTexaco:Chevron^Texaco9 ACCRA-org ;
Colorin-Colorado:Colorin-Colorado9 ACCRA-obj ; !an expedition
Crohns FirstTag ;
Cuando:Cu^ando9 ACCRA-mal ;
Davao:Davao9 ACCRA-plc ;
Deanut FirstTag ;
Domino:Domino9 ACCRA-org ;
El+CmpN/None:El FirstTag ; !
Elmo:Elmo9 ACCRA-fem ;
Eteläaho:Etelä^aho9 ACCRA-sur ;
Evo:Evo9 ACCRA-org ;
Fernando:Fernando9 ACCRA-mal ;
Finlandia ACCRA-obj ;
Sámi% Jakki ACCRA-obj ;
Sámi% Særvi ACCRA-obj ;
Sážžá+Use/Sub:Sážža ACCRA-plc ; !
Frostvikens:Frost^vikens FirstTag ;
Kauto-crossa:Kauto-crossa ACCRA-obj ;
Gestapo:Gestapo9 ACCRA-obj ;
Grei ACCRA-org ;
Gro:Gro9 ACCRA-fem ;
Guro:Guro9 ACCRA-fem ;
Gävleborgs:Gävle^borgs FirstTag ;
Hahto:Hahto9 ACCRA-sur ;
Heikinheimo:Heikin^heimo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Hejjá:Hej9j9á ACCRA-mal ;
Hierro:Hierro9 ACCRA-plc ;
Honko:Honko9 ACCRA-sur ;
Offiseara+Use/LexSub:Offiseara ACCRA-obj ; ! !is this a name?
Otto-automáhta ACCRA-obj ;
Ilo:Ilo9 ACCRA-obj ;
Ingo:Ingo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Isokallio:Iso^kallio9 ACCRA-sur ;
Iŋggá FirstTag ;
Jeneda ACCRA-fem ;
Jethro:Jethro9 ACCRA-mal ;
Jišva ACCRA-plc ;
Julevädnu ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;
Juno:Juno9 ACCRA-fem ;
Junossuando:Junos^su^ando9 ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;
Junosuando:Juno^su^ando9 ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;
Kaisto:Kaisto9 ACCRA-mal ;
Kakko:Kakko9 ACCRA-sur ;
Kanako:Kanako9 ACCRA-fem ;
Karesuando:Kare^su^ando9 ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;
Kauto:Kauto9 ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;
Kautokeino% kommune ACCRA-LOAN-org ;
Kautokeino:Kauto^keino9 ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;
Keiko:Keiko9 ACCRA-fem ;
Kill% Buljo:Kill% Buljo9 ACCRA-obj ;
Klubbu FirstTag ;
Koho:Koho9 ACCRA-mal ;
Koivikko:Koivikko9 ACCRA-sur ;
Kolo:Kolo9 ACCRA-org ;
Kongo:Kongo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Koutokeino:Kouto^keino9 ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;
Kvello:Kvello9 ACCRA-sur ;
Kåfjord% kommune ACCRA-LOAN-org ;
LagasRadio:Lagas^Radio9 ACCRA-org ;
Les+CmpN/None:Les FirstTag ; !
Liao:Li^ao9 ACCRA-mal ;
Liemmajoen% Anni ACCRA-obj ;
Likssjuo:Liks^sjuo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Liukko:Liukko9 ACCRA-sur ;
Lovdata ACCRA-org ;
Loččá ACCRA-fem ;
Magnehtalaš FirstTag ;
Maribo:Maribo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Mauno:Mauno9 ACCRA-mal ;
Melbo:Mel^bo9 ACCRA-org ;
Muonio:Muonio9 ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;
Mákredáža ACCRA-fem ;
México:México9 ACCRA-plc ;
NATO:NATO ACCRA-org ;
NAVO:NAVO ACCRA-obj ;
Nataša ACCRA-fem ;
Navaho:Navaho9 ACCRA-obj ;
Navo:Navo9 ACCRA-obj ;
Neidens FirstTag ;
Niemiaho:Niemi^aho9 ACCRA-sur ;
Niilo:Niilo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Nuorttat FirstTag ;
OOSMO:OOSMO ACCRA-org ;
Paavo:Paavo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Pahkasalo:Pahka^salo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Pajimuš FirstTag ; !sub !FIN
Peippo:Peippo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Pirjo:Pirjo9 ACCRA-fem ;
Prato:Prato9 ACCRA-plc ;
Pressefoto:Presse^foto9 ACCRA-obj ;
Pusi ACCRA-ani ;
Päätalo:Pää^talo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Rahko:Rahko9 ACCRA-mal ;
RealAudio:Real^Audio9 ACCRA-obj ;
Ricardo:Ricardo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Riesto:Riesto9 ACCRA-sur ;
Rikstoto:Rikstoto9 ACCRA-org ;
Romeo:Romeo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Ruokso:Ruokso9 ACCRA-ani ;
SMS% från% Soppero+CmpN/None:SMS% från% Soppero9 ACCRA-obj ;
Saemien FirstTag ;
Samfoto:Sam^foto9 ACCRA-org ;
Santo:Santo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Saviluoto:Savi^luoto9 ACCRA-sur ;
Savtso:Savtso9 ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;
Saxo:Saxo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Sašša ACCRA-fem ;
Siskkit FirstTag ;
Sorrento:Sorrento9 ACCRA-plc ;
Sparbo:Sparbo9 ACCRA-org ;
Stuorát FirstTag ;
Suivakko:Suivakko9 ACCRA-ani ;
Sulo:Sulo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Sálmmo:Sálmmo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Sámi% Radio:Sámi% Radio9 ACCRA-org ;
Tano:Tano9 ACCRA-org ;
Taro:Taro9 ACCRA-ani ;
Tearbmasymposia:Tearbma^symposia ACCRA-obj ;
Tellervo:Tellervo9 ACCRA-fem ;
Tobro:To^bro9 ACCRA-plc ;
Tuomo:Tuomo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Uhca FirstTag ;
Unesco:Unesco9 ACCRA-org ;
Valio:Valio9 ACCRA-malsur ;
Vanhatalo:Vanha^talo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Vidduljienuo:Viddul^jienuo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Vieno:Vieno9 ACCRA-fem ; !Also sur
Voijaa% minun% poroni ACCRA-obj ;
Voito:Voito9 ACCRA-mal ;
Vuokko:Vuokko9 ACCRA-fem ;
Vuolimus FirstTag ;
Vuotso:Vuotso9 ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;
Välitalo:Väli^talo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Webbradio:Webb^radio9 ACCRA-obj ;
Ytre FirstTag ;
Čebu ACCRA-ani ;
Šefo:Šefo9 ACCRA-org ;
Skáidi+Use/Sub:Skaidi ACCRA-plc ; !
